Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1907
Transnational repression; Nebraska State Patrol; training.

(1) The Nebraska State Patrol may develop a transnational repression recognition and response training. The training may be regularly updated to address emerging threats and specific information on tactics used by specific foreign principals.

(2) Such training may include:

(a) How to identify different tactics of transnational repression in physical and nonphysical forms;

(b) Those foreign principals that are known to employ transnational repression, including not only those who use it most frequently, but also those who use it most egregiously, including, but not limited to, tools of digital surveillance and other Internet-based tools frequently used to carry out transnational repression activities;

(c) Best practices for appropriate local and state law enforcement prevention, reporting, and response tactics; and

(d) Information about communities targeted by transnational repression and propaganda that may be perpetuated by foreign principals.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 20.